Nevada, session 83, SB394.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 477 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
A person shall not sell or offer to sell fireworks to any person
who is less than 18 years of age.
-
*SB394*

– 2 –
Sec. 2. NRS 244.367 is hereby amended to read as follows:
244.367 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, the
board of county commissioners shall have power and jurisdiction in
their respective counties to pass ordinances:
(a) Prohibiting, restricting, suppressing or otherwise regulating
the sale, use, storage and possession of fireworks; and
(b) Providing for the imposition of criminal or civil penalties, or
both, for the violation thereof. A civil penalty imposed pursuant to
such an ordinance must not be:
(1) In an amount less than $250 or more than $1,000 for a
violation involving less than 100 pounds in gross weight of
fireworks, including packaging;
(2) In an amount less than $1,000 or more than $5,000 for a
violation involving not less than 100 pounds or more than 5,000
pounds in gross weight of fireworks, including packaging;
(3) In an amount less than $5,000 or more than $10,000 for a
violation involving more than 5,000 pounds in gross weight of
fireworks, including packaging; or
(4) Imposed against a person who has been issued a license
or permit pursuant to the ordinance.
2. An ordinance passed pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Provide that any license or permit that may be required for
the sale of fireworks must be issued by the licensing authority for:
(1) The county, if the fireworks are sold within the
unincorporated areas of the county; or
(2) A city located within the county, if the fireworks are sold
within the jurisdiction of that city; and
(b) Establish factors for determining the severity of any criminal
penalty or any civil penalty within the limits contained in paragraph
(b) of subsection 1 that take into account, without limitation, the
number and severity of any previous violations.
3. An ordinance passed pursuant to subsection 1 must not
apply to a child under the age of 18 years [unless the child is
emancipated.] or conflict with the provisions of section 1 of this
act.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
H
-
*SB394*